nb: Festetype for styltefot: Stropp med spenne; Borrelåsstropp; Integrert støvel; Snøring; Ingen feste (boks/bøtte); Jekkestropp; Annet
de: Befestigungsart des Stelzenfußes: Schnallenriemen; Klettverschlussriemen; Integrierter Schuh; Schnürung; Keine Befestigung (Dose/Eimer); Ratschenriemen; Andere
da: Fastgørelsestype for styltefod: Rem med spænde; Burrebåndsrem; Integreret støvle; Snørelukning; Ingen fastgørelse (dåse/spand); Skralderem; Andet
sk-SK: Typ uchytenia nohy k chodúľom: Popruh s prackou; Popruh so suchým zipsom; Integrovaná topánka; Na šnurovanie; Bez uchytenia (plechovka/vedierko); Popruh s račňou; Iné
tr: Sırık ayakkabısı ayak bağlantı tipi: Tokalı kayış; Cırt cırtlı kayış; Entegre bot; Bağcıklı; Bağlantısız (kutu/kova); Cırcırlı kayış; Diğer
es: Tipo de sujeción del pie de zanco: Correa con hebilla; Correa de gancho y bucle; Bota integrada; Con cordones; Sin fijación (lata/cubo); Correa de trinquete; Otro
fr: Type de fixation du pied: Sangle à boucle; Sangle auto-agrippante; Botte intégrée; À lacer; Aucune attache (boîte/seau); Sangle à cliquet; Autre
zh-TW: 高蹺腳固定類型: 扣環綁帶; 魔鬼氈綁帶; 一體成型靴; 綁帶; 無配件 (罐/桶); 棘輪綁帶; 其他
vi: Loại gắn chân cà kheo: Dây đeo có khóa; Dây đeo băng gai dính; Ủng tích hợp; Buộc dây; Không có phần gắn (lon/thùng); Dây chằng tăng đơ; Khác
pl: Typ mocowania stopy szczudła: Pasek z klamrą; Pasek na rzep; Zintegrowany but; Sznurowane; Bez zaczepu (puszka/wiaderko); Pasek z napinaczem; Inny
fi: Puujalan jalkakiinnityksen tyyppi: Solkihihna; Tarranauha; Integroitu kenkä; Nauhakiinnitys; Ei kiinnitystä (purkki/ämpäri); Räikkähihna; Muu
it: Tipo di attacco per trampoli: Cinturino con fibbia; Cinturino a strappo; Stivale integrato; Con lacci; Nessun attacco (barattolo/secchio); Cinturino a cricchetto; Altro
zh-CN: 高跷足部固定类型: 搭扣带; 魔术贴带; 一体式靴子; 系带式; 无附件（罐/桶）; 棘轮绑带; 其他
sv: Fäste för styltafot: Rem med spänne; Kardborrerem; Integrerad stövel; Snörning; Inget fäste (burk/hink); Spännband; Övrigt
cs: Typ uchycení nohy na chůdách: Popruh s přezkou; Popruh na suchý zip; Integrovaná bota; Šněrovací; Bez připojení (plechovka/kyblík); Upínací popruh s ráčnou; Jiné
el: Τύπος στερέωσης ποδιού σε ξυλοπόδαρο: Ιμάντας με αγκράφα; Ιμάντας με σκρατς (Velcro); Ενσωματωμένη μπότα; Με κορδόνια; Χωρίς εξάρτημα (τενεκεδάκι/κουβάς); Ιμάντας με καστάνια; Άλλο
th: ประเภทการยึดขาค้ำยัน: สายรัดหัวเข็มขัด; สายรัดแบบตีนตุ๊กแก; รองเท้าบูทในตัว; ผูกเชือก; ไม่มีที่ยึดติด (กระป๋อง/ถัง); สายรัดแบบเฟืองสับ; อื่นๆ
en: Stilt foot attachment type: Buckle strap; Hook & loop strap; Integrated boot; Lace-up; No attachment (can/bucket); Ratchet strap; Other
ko: 스틸트 발 부착 유형: 버클 스트랩; 후크 앤 루프 스트랩; 일체형 부츠; 레이스업; 부착물 없음(캔/버킷); 래칫 스트랩; 기타
ro-RO: Tip de atașare a piciorului pe picioroange: Curea cu cataramă; Curea cu scai; Gheată integrată; Cu șireturi; Fără prindere (cutie/găleată); Curea cu clichet; Altele
pt-PT: Tipo de fixação do pé às pernas de pau: Correia com fivela; Correia com fecho aderente; Bota integrada; De atar; Sem fixação (lata/balde); Correia de roquete; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta pričvršćivanja za stopalo za štule: Remen s kopčom; Remen na čičak; Integrirana čizma; Na vezanje; Bez pričvršćivanja (kanta/lonac); Remen sa zatezačem; Ostalo
sl-SI: Vrsta pritrditve na podnožje za hodulje: Trak z zaponko; Sprijemalni trak; Vgrajen čevelj; Na vezalke; Brez pritrditve (pločevinka/vedro); Zatezni trak z ragljo; Drugo
ja: 竹馬の足部取付タイプ: バックルストラップ; 面ファスナーストラップ; ブーツ一体型; 編み込み式; アタッチメントなし (缶/バケツ); ラチェットストラップ; その他
hu: Gólyaláb-rögzítés típusa: Csatospánt; Tépőzáras pánt; Beépített csizma; Fűzős; Nincs rögzítés (doboz/vödör); Racsnis pánt; Egyéb
ru: Тип крепления ноги к ходулям: Ремешок с пряжкой; Ремешок на липучке; Встроенный ботинок; На шнуровке; Без крепления (банки/ведра); Ремешок с храповым механизмом; Другое
lt-LT: Kojūkų pėdos tvirtinimo tipas: Dirželis su sagtimi; Kibioji juosta; Integruotas batas; Suvarstomas; Be tvirtinimo (skardinė / kibiras); Dirželis su terkšle; Kita
bg-BG: Тип на закрепване на опората за крака на кокили: Каишка с катарама; Каишка с велкро; Вградена обувка; С връзки; Без прикрепване (кен/кофа); Каишка с тресчотка; Друго
nl: Stelt voetbevestigingstype: Gespband; Klittenband; Geïntegreerde laars; Vetersluiting; Geen bevestiging (blik/emmer); Spanband; Overig
pt-BR: Perna de pau tipo de fixação do pé: Tira com fivela; Tira de fecho de contato; Bota integrada; Amarração; Sem fixação (lata/balde); Tira com catraca; Outro